Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.685

Prescriptions—Filled by druggists.

Registered pharmacists of this state may fill prescriptions of legally licensed dentists of this state for any drug necessary in the practice of dentistry.

[ 1935 c 112 s 26; RRS s 10031-26. Prior: 1923 c 16 s 24. Formerly RCW 18.32.320.]

NOTES:

Pharmacists: Chapter 18.64 RCW.